Wyoming, session 2025, SF0001.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. As used in this act:

(a) "Agency" means any governmental unit or branch of government
receiving an appropriation under this act;

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
(b) "Appropriation" means the authorizations granted by the
legislature under this act to make expenditures from and to incur obligations
against the general and other funds as specified;

(c) "Approved budget" means as defined by W.S. 9-2-1002(a)(xxiii);

(d) "A4" means an agency trust account;

(e) "EF" means the agency's account within the enterprise fund;

(f) "FF" means federal funds;

(g) "IS" means the agency's account within the internal service fund;

(h) "PF" means the retirement account created by W.S. 9-3-407(a);

(j) "PR" means private funding sources;

(k) "P2" means the deferred compensation account referenced in W.S.
9-3-507;

(m) "SR" means an agency's account within the special revenue fund;

(n) "S1" means water development account I created by W.S.
41-2-124(a)(i);

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
(o) "S2" means water development account II created by W.S.
41-2-124(a)(ii);

(p) "S4" means the local government capital construction account
funded by W.S. 9-4-601(a)(vi) and (b)(i)(A) and 39-14-801(e)(ix);

(q) "S5" means the "school foundation program account" or "public
school foundation program account" created by W.S. 21-13-306(a);

(r) "S7" means the highway fund;

(s) "S10" means the legislative stabilization reserve account;

(t) "S13" means the strategic investments and projects account;

(u) "S14" means the Wyoming tourism account;

(w) "S0" means other funds identified by footnote;

(y) "T2" means the miners' hospital permanent land income fund;

(z) "T3" means the state hospital account within the permanent land
fund;

(aa) "T4" means the poor farm account within the permanent land fund
as established by W.S. 9-4-310(a)(v);

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
(bb) "T0" means other expendable trust funds administered by an agency
for specific functions within the agency's authority;

(cc) "TT" means the tobacco settlement trust income account;

(dd) "This appropriation," when used in a footnote, shall be construed
as a reference to that portion of the appropriated funds identified in the
footnote;

(ee) "ARPD" means American Rescue Plan Act direct funds, which are any
unexpended, unobligated funds received by the state of Wyoming through the
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund established under section 602 of title
VI of the federal Social Security Act, as created by section 9901 of the
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2. "ARPD" shall not include
expenditures authorized under the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-
2 and section 602(c)(1)(C) of Title VI of the federal Social Security Act for
revenue replacement for the provision of government services to the extent of
the state of Wyoming's reduction in revenue.

Section 2. Sections 001, 004, 006, 008, 010, 011, 020, 024, 027, 039,
045, 048, 049, 057, 060, 067, 077, 080, 085, 096, 101, 157, 205 and 038 of
2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 2 are amended to read:

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 001. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR 16.
PROGRAM
Administration 1., 2., 3. 9,133,078 9,133,078
Tribal Liaison 479,554 479,554
Commission on Uniform Laws 94,903 94,903
Special Contingency 1,000,000 1,000,000
2,000,000 2,000,000
Homeland Security 4., 5., 8.,
9., 10., 11., 13. 11,593,621 21,475,220 885,805 SR 33,954,646
13,057,587 35,418,612
Natural Resource Policy 6., 12. 1,000,000 1,000,000 SR 2,000,000
Endangered Species Admin. 675,000 675,000
Baseline Scientific Assess. 307,150 307,150
WY Innov. Partnership 7., 14. 15,000,000 15,000,000
15,200,000 15,200,000
Interstate Water Rights 15. 2,500,000 2,500,000

TOTALS 39,283,306 21,475,220 1,885,805 62,644,331
44,447,272 67,808,297

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 42
Part Time 2
TOTAL 44

1. Of this general fund appropriation, it is the intent of the legislature
that forty-eight thousand dollars ($48,000.00) for a customer relationship
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
management software contractor be included in the governor's office standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

2. Of this general fund appropriation, eight thousand dollars ($8,000.00) is
appropriated for the governor's appointees to the legislature's select
committee on blockchain, financial technology and digital innovation
technology and is effective only if the select committee remains in existence
for the fiscal biennium.

3. Of this general fund appropriation, any funds expended for wild horse or
burro management on the Wind River Indian Reservation are conditioned upon
matching funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of appropriated general
funds to not less than one dollar ($1.00) of matching funds from any funds
provided by the Eastern Shoshone Tribe or the Northern Arapaho Tribe.

4. Of this general fund appropriation, up to twenty thousand dollars
($20,000.00) is appropriated for in-person meetings of the state emergency
response commission created under W.S. 35-9-153. This appropriation shall
not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.

5. Of this general fund appropriation, eight hundred thousand dollars
($800,000.00) is appropriated to provide matching funds for the building
resilient infrastructure and communities federal grant program. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $

6. (a) This general fund appropriation shall be deposited into the federal
natural resource policy account. All funds within the federal natural
resource policy account are appropriated and available for expenditure by the
governor in accordance with W.S. 9-4-218, including expenditure by the
governor for litigation costs incurred by Wyoming counties involved in
litigation related to any of the following:

(i) Federal land, water, air, mineral and other natural resource
policies that may affect the state or counties pursuant to W.S.
9-4-218(a)(iii);

(ii) Treaties between the United States and a federally
recognized Indian tribe.

7. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000.00) is appropriated for phase III of the Wyoming innovation
partnership. The following shall apply to this appropriation:

(i) Up to four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000.00) may be
expended for one (1) or more at-will employee contract positions within the
personal services series (100 series) or through the contractual services
series (900 series) as necessary to administer, monitor and inform the joint
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
appropriations committee at regular intervals on the status, metrics, outputs
and outcomes of the Wyoming innovation partnership;

(ii) No funds shall be expended until the governor determines
that appropriate metrics have been established to measure the intended
outputs and outcomes of the Wyoming innovation partnership and that the
expenditures will result in a reasonable likelihood of successfully achieving
the identified metrics. The governor's office shall include a report of the
established metrics and results within any budget request submitted under
W.S. 9-2-1013 in which the office seeks additional funding for the
partnership;

(iii) Expenditures shall be approved by the governor and
reported to the joint appropriations committee through the B-11 process as
authorized by W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii) and reported pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1013(b);

(iv) This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included within the office of the governor's standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

(b) The appropriation subject to subsection (a) of this footnote shall
not be subject to Section 347 of this act.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
8. Of this general fund appropriation, four million dollars ($4,000,000.00)
is appropriated to the office of homeland security within the governor's
office for the state support fund unit for equipment needs associated with
responses to hazardous materials. It is the intent of the legislature that
this appropriation not be included in the governor's office, office of
homeland security's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose.

9. Of this general fund appropriation, one million five hundred thousand
dollars ($1,500,000.00) is appropriated to the office of homeland security
within the governor's office for the state support fund unit for equipment
needs associated with responses to weapons of mass destruction by emergency
response teams. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation
not be included in the governor's office, office of homeland security's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.

10. Of this general fund appropriation, twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00)
is appropriated for the lifesaver program under W.S. 19-13-117 and to assess
requirements for dementia training for law enforcement, first responders and
other search personnel. The office of homeland security shall report to the
joint judiciary interim committee not later than October 1, 2024.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
11. Of this general fund appropriation, seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
($750,000.00) is appropriated for reimbursing Wyoming agencies for expenses
to assist border state law enforcement efforts. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included in the office of the
governor's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other
purpose.
12. Of this other funds appropriation, there is appropriated eight hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($850,000.00) from the federal natural resource policy
account to the office of the governor for the purposes of funding the costs
of two (2) full-time positions within a statewide association representing
counties to enhance county interdisciplinary capability and to protect state
and local federal natural resource interests from federal government action
in cooperation and coordination with the governor's office. It is the intent
of the legislature that this appropriation be included within the office of
the governor's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose.

13. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000.00) is appropriated for a state hazard mitigation plan. The office
of the governor is specifically authorized to accept pre-disaster and post-
disaster mitigation grant funding through the federal emergency management
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
agency for hazard mitigation, building resilient infrastructure and
communities, flood mitigation assistance, high hazard potential dams and
similar federal programs.

14. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000.00) is appropriated for an efficiency study related to the Wyoming
innovation partnership to collect data and information to strengthen future
educational efforts and improve student outcomes. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included within the office of the
governor's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
Any results of the study under this footnote are to be included in the office
of the governor's budget request or supplemental materials for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

15. Of this general fund appropriation, two million five hundred thousand
dollars ($2,500,000.00) is appropriated for contract legal counsel to defend
Wyoming's water interests and contract legal counsel for the adjudication of
interstate water rights. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose.

16. For the period commencing on the effective date of this act and ending
June 30, 2026, no funds from the public school foundation program account or
any other source shall be expended for contract services or to support state
personnel, including at-will employee contract positions, relating to or
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
acting as a liaison with, the Wyoming charter school authorizing board. It
is the intent of the legislature that any increases to amounts authorized for
expenditure by legislative appropriation by the governor pursuant to W.S.
9-2-1005(b)(ii) from the public school foundation program account to the
office of the governor not be included in the standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 004. STATE TREASURER
PROGRAM
Treasurer's Operations 3,483,429 158,236 SR 3,641,665
Veterans' Tax Exemption 11,545,839 11,545,839
Invest. & Fin. Acct. 1., 2. 36,936,657 SR 36,936,657
36,963,607 SR 36,963,607
Unclaimed Property 1,917,244 SR 1,917,244
2,217,562 SR 2,217,562
Investments 1., 2. 12,150,569 SR 12,150,569
13,470,931 SR 13,470,931
Native American Exemption 661,671 661,671

TOTALS 15,690,939 0 51,162,706 66,853,645
52,810,336 68,501,275

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 47 52
Part Time 0
TOTAL 47 52

1. Beginning July 1, 2024 and ending June 30, 2026, except for performance
compensation authorized under W.S. 9-1-409(e), no funds shall be expended to
increase the compensation of state treasurer's office investment employees
listed in W.S. 9-1-409(e)(ii) without further legislative authorization.

2. A portion of this other funds appropriation may be expended to conduct
the purposes of this footnote. In accordance with W.S. 9-1-205(a), during
the period beginning July 1, 2024 and ending June 30, 2026, the state
treasurer's office shall annually provide a public accounting of the direct,
indirect and total investment fees for all external investment managers in
both absolute dollars and as a percentage of state investments under
management.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 006. ADMINISTRATION AND INFORMATION
PROGRAM
Director's Office 4,227,956 212,662 SR 4,440,618
Professional Licensing Bds. 1,709,965 SR 1,709,965
General Services 1., 2. 69,997,548 28,409,449 IS
70,872,961
2,804,104 SR 101,211,101
102,086,514
Human Resources Division 21,782,916 71,302 21,854,218
Employees' Group Insurance 829,474,007 IS
8,002,768 SR 837,476,775
Economic Analysis 1,294,093 1,294,093
State Library 4,746,255 2,500,407 4,069,308 SR 11,315,970

TOTALS 102,048,768 2,571,709 874,682,263 979,302,740
102,924,181 980,178,153

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 284
Part Time 1
TOTAL 285

1. Of this general fund appropriation, five million dollars ($5,000,000.00)
is for the risk management section. It is the intent of the legislature that
this appropriation not be included within the department of administration
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
and information's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.

2. Of this general fund appropriation, three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000.00) shall only be effective if the department of administration and
information ensures that three hundred thirteen thousand nine hundred fifty-
four dollars ($313,954.00), or as much thereof as is available from the
original amount subject to this footnote, is to ensure that the Wyoming
capitol building is open to the public for special events, and during the
summer on Saturdays and for extended weekday hours. This appropriation shall
not be transferred or expended for any other purpose be transferred to the
capitol square preservation account on or before March 15, 2025.
Expenditures from the capitol square preservation account shall be subject to
the terms of a memorandum of understanding executed in accordance with W.S.
9-5-106(f). Notwithstanding W.S. 9-4-225, funds in the capitol square
preservation account may be expended to ensure that the Wyoming capitol
building is open to the public for special events, during the summer on
Saturdays and for extended weekday hours.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 008. OFFICE OF THE PUBLIC DEFENDER
PROGRAM
Administration 1. 26,035,169 4,564,582 SR 30,599,751
TOTALS 26,035,169 0 4,564,582 30,599,751

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 78
Part Time 14
TOTAL 92

1. Of this general fund appropriation, twenty-four million seven hundred
seventy thousand five hundred fifty dollars ($24,770,550.00) and of this
other funds appropriation, four million three hundred seventy-one thousand
two hundred seventy-three dollars ($4,371,273.00)SR may be expended for
contract trial attorneys, contract legal support or compensation of full-time
and part-time employee positions authorized for the office of the public
defender to address caseload work requirements and geographic distribution in
the most effective and efficient manner as determined by the public defender.
This appropriation shall not be subject to Section 347 of this act.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 010. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
PROGRAM
Administration Div. 2,344,379 5,209 SR 2,349,588
Ag. Education and Info. 16,000 20,834 SR 36,834
Consumer Prot. Div. 1. 12,363,687 1,364,439 1,706,485 SR 15,434,611
Natural Resources Div. 2. 4,062,402 8,244 683,365 S1
258,000 S5 5,012,011
Pesticide Registration 773,671 773,671
State Fair 2,677,929 1,683,088 SR 4,361,017
Weed & Pest Control 1,035,587 SR 1,035,587
Predator Management 3., 4. 10,000,000 1,000,000 SR 11,000,000
Wyoming Beef Council 2,521,428 SR 2,521,428
Wyo Wheat Mktg. Comm. 186,152 SR 186,152
Dry Bean Commission 312,511 SR 312,511
Leaf Cutter Bee 11,663 SR 11,663
TOTALS 32,238,068 1,372,683 9,424,322 43,035,073

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 74
Part Time 6
TOTAL 80

1. It is the intent of the legislature that of this general fund
appropriation, fourteen thousand eight hundred dollars ($14,800.00) not be
included in the department of agriculture's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $

2. Of this general fund appropriation, three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000.00) is appropriated for Wyoming agriculture in the classroom. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.

3. (a) It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
included in the department of agriculture's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

(b) Of this general fund appropriation, one hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($150,000.00) is appropriated for expenditure in accordance with
chapter 2 of the Wyoming animal damage management board rules and for gray
wolf depredation compensation. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose.

4. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, one million six hundred thousand
dollars ($1,600,000.00) is appropriated for:

(i) Special projects prioritized for preventing listing of a
species as endangered;

(ii) Projects that directly involve predator control that will
have the greatest benefit to wildlife or reduce the cost to the department
for animal damage payments.
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $

(b) Of this other funds appropriation, one million dollars
($1,000,000.00)SR is from the game and fish fund. This other funds
appropriation to the department of agriculture shall only be effective upon a
majority vote of the game and fish commission and if approved, shall be
expended in concurrence with the priorities of this footnote.

(b)(c) The appropriations specified in this footnote shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.

Section 011. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE
PROGRAM
Administration 1. 6,517,488 6,517,488
Revenue Division 9,919,703 943,016 SR 10,862,719
Valuation Division 27,934,359 27,934,359
38,509,359 38,509,359
Liquor Division 2. 12,245,254 EF 12,245,254
Liquor Sales & Purchases 275,000,000 EF 275,000,000
General Fund Transfers 42,000,000 EF 42,000,000

TOTALS 44,371,550 0 330,188,270 374,559,820
54,946,550 385,134,820

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 124
Part Time 0
TOTAL 124

1. It is the intent of the legislature that of this general fund
appropriation, eighty thousand two hundred sixteen dollars ($80,216.00) not
be included in the department of revenue's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

2. It is the intent of the legislature that of this other funds
appropriation, one hundred fifty-one thousand nine hundred dollars
($151,900.00)EF not be included in the department of revenue's standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 020. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY
PROGRAM
Administration 7,576,160 7,576,160
Air Quality 11,185,649 1,696,777 16,494,155 SR 29,376,581
Water Quality 1. 14,388,334 10,524,538 1,198,071 SR 26,110,943
Land Quality 5,798,325 4,538,247 10,336,572
Industrial Siting 742,898 742,898
Solid Waste Management 2. 13,391,656 3,733,018 5,070,809 SR 22,195,483
Uranium Recovery Program 2,592,581 SR 2,592,581
2,672,277 SR 2,672,277
Abandoned Mine Reclam. 103,540,285 103,540,285
Subsidence Loss Ins. 200,678 SR 200,678

TOTALS 53,083,022 124,032,865 25,556,294 202,672,181
25,635,990 202,751,877

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 1. 273
Part Time 0
TOTAL 273

1. Of this general fund appropriation, eighty thousand seven hundred ninety-
seven dollars ($80,797.00) and of these authorized employees, two (2) full-
time positions are effective immediately.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
2. Of this general fund appropriation, ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00)
shall be deposited into the municipal solid waste cease and transfer grant
account.

Section 024. STATE PARKS & CULTURAL RESOURCES

PROGRAM
Administration & Support 2,441,387 2,441,387
Cultural Resources 1., 2.,
3., 4., 5., 6. 9,946,917 3,778,744 206,277 EF
224,820 S14
4,924,210 SR 19,080,968
St. Parks & Hist. Sites 7. 22,140,198 7,284,431 152,861 EF
18,801,442
800,000 S14
18,252,605 SR 48,630,095
45,291,339

TOTALS 34,528,502 11,063,175 24,560,773 70,152,450
31,189,746 66,813,694

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 149
Part Time 71
TOTAL 220

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
1. Of this general fund appropriation, not less than sixty-three thousand
dollars ($63,000.00) is appropriated to support manuscripts and publication
of the annals of Wyoming.

2. Of this general fund appropriation, one hundred twenty thousand dollars
($120,000.00) is appropriated for the "We the People" educational program.
No funds from this appropriation shall be expended to pay or reimburse the
University of Wyoming for indirect cost recovery or overhead expenses for the
administration of the "We the People" educational program. It is the intent
of the legislature that this appropriation be included in the department of
state parks and cultural resources' standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose.

3. Of this general fund appropriation, three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000.00) is appropriated and conditioned upon matching funds in the
ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of appropriated general funds to not less than
two dollars ($2.00) of matching funds from any nonstate sources for purposes
of providing grants for humanities initiatives. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation be included in the department of state
parks and cultural resources' standard budget for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
4. Of this general fund appropriation, ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) is
appropriated to support the Wyoming centennial farm and ranch program. It is
the intent of the legislature that this appropriation not be included in the
department of state parks and cultural resources' standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.

5. Of this general fund appropriation, ninety-six thousand five hundred
eleven dollars ($96,511.00) may be expended for authorized full-time and
part-time employee positions within the personal services series (100 series)
or through the contractual services series (900 series) as necessary to
ensure the state's archaeology work on human remains is completed in the most
effective and efficient manner as determined by the director of the
department of state parks and cultural resources. This appropriation shall
not be subject to Section 347 of this act.

6. It is the intent of the legislature that of this general fund
appropriation, one hundred seventy thousand five hundred forty-five dollars
($170,545.00) not be included in the department of state parks and cultural
resources' standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

7. Of this general fund appropriation, three million five hundred thousand
dollars ($3,500,000.00) one hundred sixty-one thousand two hundred forty-four
dollars ($161,244.00) is appropriated for operations, site improvements,
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
facility stabilization, major maintenance and up to two (2) at-will employee
contract positions at the high plains research station and arboretum as
determined by the director of the department of state parks and cultural
resources. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation
and authorized at-will employee contract positions not be included in the
department of state parks and cultural resources' standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 027. STATE CONSTRUCTION DEPARTMENT
PROGRAM
Operations 1,929,954 5,082,079 S5 7,012,033
School Facilities Div. 1. 180,337,954 S5 180,337,954
183,225,575 S5 183,225,575
Construction Management 1,610,806 1,610,806

TOTALS 3,540,760 0 185,420,033 188,960,793
188,307,654 191,848,414

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 29
Part Time 0
TOTAL 29

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
1. School district expenditures from this appropriation are for purposes
specified in W.S. 21-15-109(e) for major building and facility repair and
replacement needs of a district that are identified in the district's
facility plan. For the period beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30,
2026, expenditures from this appropriation shall not include maintenance of
district enhancements or any expenditures specified in W.S. 21-15-109(f).

Section 039. WILDLIFE/NATURAL RESOURCE TRUST
PROGRAM
Encana Oil & Gas 121,900 SR 121,900
Administration 1. 9,000,000 16,806,447 SR 25,806,447
20,000,000 36,806,447
WYCM 7,973,330 SR 7,973,330
Trust Corpus 2. 2,000,000 SR 2,000,000

TOTALS 9,000,000 0 26,901,677 35,901,677
20,000,000 46,901,677

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 2
Part Time 0
TOTAL 2

1. Of this general fund appropriation, nine million dollars ($9,000,000.00)
twenty million dollars ($20,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Wyoming
wildlife and natural resource trust income account and is continuously
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
appropriated to provide grants for preventing the introduction and spread of
invasive plants and grasses with a focus on private and state lands across
Wyoming. This appropriation is intended for the purposes specified in this
footnote and is not subject to the grant process specified in W.S. 9-15-101
through 9-15-107. This appropriation is effective immediately.

2. Of this other funds appropriation, two million dollars ($2,000,000.00)SR
is appropriated from the Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust income
account and shall be deposited into the corpus of the Wyoming wildlife and
natural resource trust account created by W.S. 9-15-103(a). This
appropriation is effective immediately.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 045. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
PROGRAM
Administration 4,306,758 S7 4,306,758
Administrative Services 170,308 41,556,660 S7
14,823,802 SR 56,550,770
Law Enforcement 1. 6,907,728 95,662,371 S7
260,000 SR 102,830,099
WyoLink 8,600,000 1,407,838 IS
1,976,366 S7 11,984,204
Aeronautics Admin. 314,282 4,749,762 S7 5,064,044
Operational Services 2,435,870 IS 2,435,870
Aeronautics 45,805,302 162,452 IS
21,052,639 S7 67,020,393
TOTALS 8,600,000 53,197,620 188,394,518 250,192,138

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 553
Part Time 0
TOTAL 553

1. Of this other funds appropriation, up to five hundred twenty-three
thousand two hundred seventy-seven dollars ($523,277.00)S7 may be expended
for law enforcement personnel expenses within the personal services series
(100 series) or through the contractual services series (900 series) as
necessary to meet capitol complex security needs in the most effective and
efficient manner as determined by the director of the department of
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
transportation. This appropriation shall not be subject to Section 347 of
this act.

Section 048. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH
PROGRAM
Director's Office 1. 12,121,670 2,204,247 313,041 SR 14,638,958
Health Care Financing 2.,
3., 4., 17. 647,703,917 915,273,823 5,000,000 S5
651,900,281 919,470,187
88,629,378 SR
1,450,000 TT 1,658,057,118
1,666,449,846
Public Health 5., 6., 15.,
18. 38,308,175 66,485,370 845,735 A4
38,308,170 66,921,328
18,061,791 SR
10,563,710 TT 134,264,781
134,700,734
Behavioral Health 7., 8.,
9., 10., 11., 12., 13., 16. 267,701,562 21,317,909 792,263 A4
266,475,455
4,378,861 S5
56,850,387 SR
56,950,387 SR
1,135,284 T3
12,072,512 TT 364,248,778
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
363,122,671
Aging 14. 38,540,881 20,693,378 14,641,757 SR 73,876,016
38,440,821 22,117,792 75,200,370

TOTALS 1,004,376,205 1,025,974,727 214,734,719 2,245,085,651
1,007,246,397 1,032,031,463 214,834,719 2,254,112,579

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 1,326 1,324
Part Time 18. 66 54

TOTAL 1,392 1,378

1. It is the intent of the legislature that of this general fund
appropriation three hundred fifty-six thousand three hundred fifty-six
dollars ($356,356.00) for information technology hardware replacement not be
included in the department of health's standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.

2. In accordance with W.S. 42-2-103(d), the state supplemental security
income monthly payment amount for the period beginning July 1, 2024 and ending
June 30, 2026 shall be the lowest amount required under federal law in order
to remain eligible for funding under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, as
amended.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
3. It is the intent of the legislature that of this general fund
appropriation twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00), and of this federal
funds appropriation two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000.00)
for benefit management system integration costs not be included in the
department of health's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.

4. Of this general fund appropriation, one million nine hundred thousand
dollars ($1,900,000.00) and of this federal funds appropriation, one million
nine hundred thousand dollars ($1,900,000.00) is appropriated for extended
postpartum coverage to pregnant individuals enrolled in Medicaid pursuant to
the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act or enrolled in the Child
Health Insurance Plan in accordance with 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter
152.

5. Of this general fund appropriation, three hundred eighty-seven thousand
four hundred sixty-five dollars ($387,465.00) is appropriated to provide
grants to county public health staff whose compensation was not increased
through distribution of funds pursuant to 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter
51, Section 319 or 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 94, Section 329.

6. Of this other funds appropriation, three million eight hundred forty-six
thousand two hundred eighty-eight dollars ($3,846,288.00)TT is effective
immediately.
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $

7. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred twenty-seven thousand
eight hundred fifty-two dollars ($227,852.00) is effective July 1, 2025. It
is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation for a 988 program
manager be doubled and included in the department of health's standard budget
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

8. It is the intent of the legislature that of this other funds
appropriation, three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($375,000.00)T3
for equipment repairs and maintenance not be included in the department of
health's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

9. It is the intent of the legislature that of this general fund
appropriation, three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000.00) for the
electronic medical record upgrade not be included in the department of
health's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

10. Of this general fund appropriation, nine hundred fifty-eight thousand
six hundred ninety-five dollars ($958,695.00) is effective July 1, 2025. It
is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation for 988 operations
be doubled and included in the department of health's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
11. Of this other funds appropriation, seven million five hundred thousand
dollars ($7,500,000.00)TT is effective immediately.

12. It is the intent of the legislature that, of this general fund
appropriation, twelve million two hundred ninety thousand three hundred
twenty-eight dollars ($12,290,328.00) for services to preschool children with
disabilities be included in the department of health's standard budget for
the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. Of this general fund
appropriation, twelve million two hundred ninety thousand three hundred
twenty-eight dollars ($12,290,328.00) shall be reduced by one dollar ($1.00)
for every one dollar ($1.00) up to twelve million two hundred ninety thousand
three hundred twenty-eight dollars ($12,290,328.00) appropriated from any
source to the department of health in 2024 Senate File 0019, if enacted into
law. It is the intent of the legislature that the total amount appropriated
by any legislation enacted in the 2024 legislative session, including 2024
Senate File 0019, for the purposes specified in this footnote not exceed
twelve million two hundred ninety thousand three hundred twenty-eight dollars
($12,290,328.00).

13. It is the intent of the legislature that of this other funds
appropriation, seven hundred forty-six thousand six dollars ($746,006.00)SR
for equipment, repairs and maintenance not be included in the department of
health's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
14. Of this general fund appropriation, ten million six hundred eighty-three
thousand forty-eight dollars ($10,683,048.00) is appropriated for grants to
Wyoming senior centers in accordance with W.S. 9-2-1212(a)(ii).

15. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred fifty thousand six
hundred ninety-five dollars ($250,695.00) is appropriated for trauma
designations and education. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be included in the department of health's standard budget for
the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.

16. (a) The department of health shall take the following actions related
to planning and demolition at the Wyoming state hospital:

(i) The department shall not demolish the boiler house,
identified as building number two (2) in the feasibility study, but may
remove or remodel the internal components of the building;

(ii) The department shall not demolish the following buildings
identified in the feasibility study:

(A) Staff residence, building number eight (8);

(B) Duplex residence, building number nine (9);
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $

(C) Clark hall annex, staff residence apartments, building
number fifteen (15);

(D) Clark hall dormitory, building number sixteen (16).

(b) As used in this footnote, "feasibility study" means appendix A.1
of the Wyoming assessment and feasibility study for the repurposing of the
Wyoming state hospital campus from December 2021. This footnote is effective
immediately.

17. Of this general fund appropriation, three million eight hundred sixty
thousand dollars ($3,860,000.00) and of this federal funds appropriation,
three million eight hundred sixty thousand dollars ($3,860,000.00) are for
payments to home and community-based service providers within the
comprehensive waiver unit. It is the intent of the legislature that this
general fund appropriation and this federal funds appropriation not be
included in the department of health's standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose.

18. Of this federal funds appropriation, four hundred thirty-five thousand
nine hundred fifty-eight dollars ($435,958.00) is appropriated for positions
within the women, infants and children unit is effective July 1, 2025. Of
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
the authorized employees, the reduction of twelve (12) part-time employee
positions is effective July 1, 2025.

Section 049. DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY SERVICES
PROGRAM
Energy Assistance & WX 22,953,914 22,953,914
Institutions 1. 23,678,637 2,783 3,609,575 S5
580,276 SR 27,871,271
Assistance & Services 2.,
3., 4., 5., 6., 7., 8. 137,140,025 127,708,875 7,559,833 SR
138,132,661
5,240,510 TT 277,649,243
278,641,879

TOTALS 160,818,662 150,665,572 16,990,194 328,474,428
161,811,298 329,467,064

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 659
Part Time 1
TOTAL 660

1. Of this other funds appropriation, one million nine hundred sixty-two
thousand seventy-nine dollars ($1,962,079.00)S5 is appropriated for
educational services at the Wyoming boys' school, and one million six hundred
forty-seven thousand four hundred ninety-six dollars ($1,647,496.00)S5 is
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
appropriated for educational services at the Wyoming girls' school. It is
the intent of the legislature that this appropriation be included in the
department of family services' standard budget for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

2. For the period beginning July 1, 2024 and ending June 30, 2026, the
department of family services shall not expend funds from this total
appropriation to support the overall capacity of residential and group home
beds in excess of the number of certified beds on January 1, 2022.

3. Of this general fund appropriation, sixty thousand dollars ($60,000.00)
is appropriated for purposes of indigent burial or cremation expenses
authorized by W.S. 42-2-103(c). It is the intent of the legislature that
this appropriation not be included in the department of family services'
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.

4. Of this general fund appropriation, one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000.00) is appropriated for juvenile justice data reporting in
accordance with 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 15. It is the intent of
the legislature that this appropriation be included in the department of
family services' standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
5. Of this general fund appropriation, one million three hundred twenty-nine
thousand seven hundred fourteen dollars ($1,329,714.00) is appropriated for
an early childhood integrated data system. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included in either the department
of family services' or community college commission's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

6. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000.00) is appropriated to furnish offices at the Wyoming life resource
center campus. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation
not be included in the department of family services' standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.

7. Of this general fund appropriation, eight hundred fifty thousand dollars
($850,000.00) and of this federal fund appropriation one hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($150,000.00) is appropriated for rate increases for foster
care providers. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose.

8. Of this general fund appropriation, two million four hundred twenty-seven
thousand ninety-seven dollars ($2,427,097.00) is appropriated to increase the
room and board reimbursement rate paid by the department of family services
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
to group homes, community crisis centers, residential treatment centers and
board of cooperative educational services facilities. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.

Section 057. COMMUNITY COLLEGE COMMISSION
PROGRAM
Administration 1. 7,585,940 736,498 SR 8,322,438
State Aid 2., 3. 244,504,156 244,504,156
Adult Education 2,025,998 1,899,341 3,925,339
WYIN Loan & Grant Prgm 4., 5. 7,521,256 7,521,256
Veterans' Tuition Waiver 481,250 481,250
Public Television 3,411,976 110,000 SR 3,521,976
500,000 SR 3,911,976

TOTALS 265,530,576 1,899,341 846,498 268,276,415
1,236,498 268,666,415

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 12
Part Time 0
TOTAL 12

1. The Wyoming community college commission shall work in good faith with
the department of family services by June 30, 2026.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
2. Of this general fund appropriation, one hundred ninety-two million four
hundred thirty-three thousand four hundred seventy-seven dollars
($192,433,477.00) is for distribution by the commission to qualifying
community colleges as provided in W.S. 21-18-205.

3. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000.00) is appropriated to support competitive rodeo teams at Wyoming
community colleges. The appropriation shall be equally distributed to all
colleges with a competitive rodeo program. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.

4. Of this general fund appropriation, four hundred eight thousand dollars
($408,000.00) is appropriated for additional student loans within the Wyoming
investment in nursing program in accordance with W.S. 9-2-123. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation be included in the Wyoming
community college commission's standard budget for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

5. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred nineteen thousand nine
hundred sixteen dollars ($219,916.00) shall be expended for any unfunded
compensation for two (2) additional faculty positions and only after all
available and permissible federal funds have been exhausted. The Wyoming
community college commission shall not expend more than six million one
hundred seventy-four thousand one hundred fifty-one dollars ($6,174,151.00)
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
for all faculty grants under this program beginning July 1, 2024 and ending
June 30, 2026. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be included in the Wyoming community college commission's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 060. STATE LANDS AND INVESTMENTS
PROGRAM
Operations 2., 3. 13,042,710 53,209,940 2,608,520 S1
420,000 S0
2,975,929 S4
314,240 S5
2,894,240 S5
7,342,848 SR 79,494,187
82,494,187
Forestry 1. 8,562,044 1,269,819 229,035 SR 10,060,898
County Emergency Suppr. 40,000,000 12,155,517 SR 12,155,517
52,155,517
Fire 4. 4,536,763 279,700 4,816,463
7,286,763 7,566,463
Forestry Performance Acct. 80,000 SR 80,000
Ranch A 16,000 SR 16,000
Mineral Royalty Grants 15,000,000 27,306,873 S4 27,306,873
42,306,873
Federal Forestry Grants 6,430,840 6,430,840
Fire Prot. Revolving Acct. 14,433,862 SR 14,433,862
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Good Neighbor Authority 14,051,609 14,051,609
Transp. Enterprise Fund 2,030,258 SR 2,030,258
Farm Loan Reserve 5,000,000 SR 5,000,000

TOTALS 26,141,517 75,241,908 74,493,082 175,876,507
83,891,517 77,493,082 236,626,507

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 102 103
Part Time 4 8

TOTAL 106 111

1. The office of state lands and investments is authorized to hire up to one
(1) additional at-will employee contract position within the forestry
division only when federal funds are received that reimburse the state for
one hundred percent (100%) of the costs of the position. In the event
federal funding becomes unavailable to maintain one hundred percent (100%)
reimbursement for a position filled pursuant to this footnote, the position
shall be eliminated. The office of state lands and investments shall notify
the joint appropriations committee of any position created or eliminated
pursuant to this footnote through the B-11 process as authorized by W.S.
9-2-1005(b)(ii) and reported pursuant to W.S. 9-2-1013(b).

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
2. Of this other funds appropriation, two million five hundred eighty
thousand dollars ($2,580,000.00)S5 and four hundred twenty thousand dollars
($420,000.00)S0 shall not be effective if either 2025 Senate File 0068 or
2025 Senate File 0081 is enacted into law.

3. Of this other funds appropriation, four hundred twenty thousand dollars
($420,000.00)S0 is appropriated in proportion to the total property taxes
assessed on state lands leased to a private entity from the agricultural
college account, university account, omnibus account and miner's hospital
account within the permanent land income fund and the deaf, dumb and blind
account, public buildings account, state hospital account, penitentiary
account, poor farm account, fish hatchery account and Carey Act account
within the permanent land fund for property taxes due. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose. This footnote
shall not be effective if either 2025 Senate File 0068 or 2025 Senate File
0081 is enacted into law.

4. Of this general fund appropriation, two million seven hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($2,750,000.00) is appropriated, and of these authorized
employees, one (1) full-time employee position and four (4) part-time
employee positions are authorized, for contract and direct fire response.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other
purpose. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
doubled and included in the office of state lands and investments' standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 067. UNIVERSITY OF WYOMING
PROGRAM
State Aid 1., 2., 3., 4., 5.,
12., 13., 15. 401,227,647 401,227,647
401,777,647 401,777,647
School of Energy Res. 6.,
7., 8., 9. 23,857,808 19,000,000 S13 42,857,808
25,947,808 44,947,808
Tier 1 Engineering 18,584,703 18,584,703
NCAR MOU 1,528,316 1,528,316
Endowments & Matching 10., 11.,
12., 14. 39,500,000 39,500,000

TOTALS 484,698,474 0 19,000,000 503,698,474
487,338,474 506,338,474

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
1. Of this general fund appropriation, three million dollars ($3,000,000.00)
is to fund graduate assistantship stipends. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose.

2. Of this general fund appropriation, two million five hundred thousand
dollars ($2,500,000.00) is for building artificial intelligence expertise.
Expenditure of this appropriation is conditioned upon a match of funds in the
ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of appropriated general funds to not less than
one dollar ($1.00) of matching funds from any person. For purposes of this
footnote, "person" includes an individual, partnership, corporation, joint
stock company or any other association or entity, excluding all public
entities. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation not be
included in the University of Wyoming's standard budget for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.

3. Of this general fund appropriation, one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)
is to increase the library collections' biennial budget. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.

4. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, ten million dollars
($10,000,000.00) is appropriated for the purpose of providing a state match
for funds received by the University of Wyoming from athletic booster
organizations or persons donating funds to be used solely for athletic
programs. This appropriation shall:
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $

(i) Be retained by the state treasurer for distribution in
accordance with the provisions of this footnote;

(ii) Be expended for the purposes of:

(A) Authorized recruitment of prospective student athletes
to the University of Wyoming and expenses associated with participation in
intercollegiate athletics including summer school attendance, nutrition,
tutoring, team travel and costs directly related to participation in
competition;

(B) Athletic training equipment.

(iii) Not be used for salaries or capital construction projects;

(iv) To the extent funds are available, be matched on a
quarterly basis by the state treasurer for each cash or cash equivalent
contribution actually received by the University of Wyoming for the purposes
specified in this footnote for the period beginning July 1, 2024 and ending
June 30, 2026 by distributing to the University of Wyoming an amount equal to
the amount of qualifying contributions for the quarter.

(b) The appropriation specified in subsection (a) of this footnote
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
shall not be transferred or expended for any purpose not specified in this
footnote and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2026.

5. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000.00) is to support the University of Wyoming rodeo team.

6. Of this other funds appropriation, seventeen million dollars
($17,000,000.00)S13 is for demonstrations of coal solvent extraction and a
coal-derived asphalt road. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose. It is the intent of the legislature that
this appropriation not be included in the University of Wyoming's standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

7. Of this other funds appropriation, two million dollars ($2,000,000.00)S13
is appropriated for the purpose of providing a state match for funds received
by the University of Wyoming or donated funds to be used solely to support
research, scholarships or endowments for the school of energy resources.
Distribution of this appropriation is conditioned upon a match of funds in
the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of appropriated other funds to not less than
one dollar ($1.00) of matching funds from any nonstate source. This
appropriation shall be retained by the state treasurer for distribution in
accordance with W.S. 21-16-904. This appropriation shall not be transferred
or expended for any other purpose. It is the intent of the legislature that
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
this appropriation not be included in the University of Wyoming's standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

8. Of this general fund appropriation, two million dollars ($2,000,000.00)
is for building and continuing nuclear energy scholarship, research and
training capacity at the University of Wyoming. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included in the University of
Wyoming's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

9. Of this general fund appropriation, seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
($750,000.00) is to administer, develop and implement an incentive innovator
competition related to lithium extraction, development or use. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose. It
is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation not be included in
the University of Wyoming's standard budget for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

10. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, twelve million dollars
($12,000,000.00) is appropriated to provide a state match for funds received
by the University of Wyoming or donated funds in accordance with the
following:

(i) Not less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) is
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
conditioned upon a match for a permanent endowment under W.S. 21-16-901
through 21-16-904. All state matching distributions from the account are
appropriated solely to support endowments for priorities identified and
approved by the University of Wyoming board of trustees;

(ii) Up to two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) is conditioned
upon a match for purposes of expenditures for priorities identified and
approved by the University of Wyoming board of trustees.

(b) Distribution of the appropriation specified in subsection (a) of
this footnote is conditioned upon a match of funds in the ratio of one dollar
($1.00) of appropriated general funds to not less than one dollar ($1.00) of
matching funds from any nonstate source. This appropriation shall be
retained by the state treasurer for distribution in accordance with W.S.
21-16-904 regardless of whether the match is for purposes of a permanent
endowment under paragraph (a)(i) of this footnote or for expenditure by the
University of Wyoming under paragraph (a)(ii) of this footnote.

11. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, twenty-five million dollars
($25,000,000.00) is appropriated to match research grants and contracts
related to flow through porous media. It is the intent of the legislature
that this appropriation not be included in the University of Wyoming's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose. Of
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
this general fund appropriation, twelve million five hundred thousand dollars
($12,500,000.00) is effective July 1, 2025, and twelve million five hundred
thousand dollars ($12,500,000.00) is effective April 1, 2026. Expenditure of
this appropriation is conditioned upon the University:

(i) Securing a match of funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00)
of appropriated general funds to not less than one dollar ($1.00) of matching
funds from any other source;

(ii) Conducting all computational and practical research to the
greatest extent reasonably possible with University of Wyoming students
within Wyoming;

(iii) Performing research on geologic formations and energy
extraction opportunities that may be found within Wyoming;

(iv) To the extent possible, developing any feasibility studies,
small-scale experiments or large-scale projects associated with research
funded by this appropriation within Wyoming.

12. No funds from this appropriation shall be expended on the office of
diversity, equity and inclusion at the University of Wyoming or on any
diversity, equity and inclusion program, activity or function.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
13. A portion of this general fund appropriation may be expended to conduct
the purposes of this footnote. The University of Wyoming shall review
opportunities, feasibility and costs associated with expanding medical
education and training for Wyoming students, including broader use of WICHE,
expanded agreements with WWAMI and new relationships with public universities
in the western regional United States. The results of the review and
recommendations shall be reported to the joint education interim committee
and joint appropriations committee not later than October 1, 2024.

14. Of this general fund appropriation, two million five hundred thousand
dollars ($2,500,000.00) is appropriated for the purpose of providing a state
match for funds received by the University of Wyoming or donated funds to be
used solely for support for excellence in research, education and extension
in ranch and rangeland management, agronomy and soil science. Distribution of
this appropriation is conditioned upon a match of funds in the ratio of one
dollar ($1.00) of appropriated general funds to not less than one dollar
($1.00) of matching funds from any other source. This appropriation shall be
retained by the state treasurer for distribution in accordance with W.S.
21-16-904. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, any
unexpended, unobligated monies from this appropriation shall not revert until
June 30, 2030.

15. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, five hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($550,000.00) is for the University of Wyoming to provide medical
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
education and training, and administrative costs thereof, for the first
cohort of five (5) students under an agreement with the University of Utah
school of medicine. Funds from this general fund appropriation shall be
expended by the University of Wyoming provided that:

(i) The board of trustees of the University of Wyoming has
entered into a contract with the University of Utah school of medicine under
W.S. 21-17-109;

(ii) The board of trustees of the University of Wyoming obtains
an agreement with any student receiving medical education and training under
this footnote as specified in W.S. 21-17-109(d); and

(iii) All other provisions of W.S. 21-17-109 are satisfied.

(b) This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation
be doubled and funding for five (5) additional medical students each academic
year be included in the University of Wyoming's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 077. ENTERPRISE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES
PROGRAM
Enterprise Operations 1., 2. 76,681,036 76,681,036
IT Enhanced Services 179,152 41,486,053 IS 41,665,205
41,779,253 IS 41,958,405
Depreciation Reserve 575,500 IS 575,500
WUN Infrastructure 15,633,873 S5 15,633,873

TOTALS 76,860,188 0 57,695,426 134,555,614
57,988,626 134,848,814

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 2. 237
Part Time 1
TOTAL 238

1. Of this general fund appropriation, one million seven hundred seventy-
three thousand two hundred twenty dollars ($1,773,220.00) for unified network
hardware replacement is effective immediately.

2. Of this general fund appropriation, two million dollars ($2,000,000.00)
for investment in information technology and cybersecurity initiatives and of
these authorized employees, ten (10) full-time positions are effective
immediately.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 080. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
PROGRAM
Administration Services 1. 11,630,003 187,543 4,631,223 EF
20,942,377
1,613,780 SR 18,062,549
27,374,923
Field Services 2., 3. 35,131,679 163,986 4,548,498 TT 39,844,163
Support Services 4. 68,860,648 100,000 1,460,095 SR
70,730,666
4,263,454 TT 74,684,197
76,554,215
Prison Division 155,486,090 169,135 EF
1,584,157 IS
249,911 SR 157,489,293

TOTALS 271,108,420 451,529 18,520,253 290,080,202
282,290,812 301,262,594

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 1,051
Part Time 3
TOTAL 1,054

1. Of this general fund appropriation, five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000.00) is for recruitment and retention efforts within the department
of corrections, including moving expenses, housing costs at the law
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
enforcement academy, career fairs, sign-on bonuses, accelerated background
checks and site specific staff retention efforts. This appropriation shall
not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.

2. Of this general fund appropriation, sixty thousand dollars ($60,000.00)
is for purposes of funding one (1) time-limited at-will employee contract
position for the period beginning July 1, 2024 and ending June 30, 2025 to
implement 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 181 relating to the restoration
of rights. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation not
be included in the department of corrections' standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

3. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000.00) is appropriated for increased daily rates for placement of
felony offenders in county jails.

4. Of this general fund appropriation, two million seven hundred thousand
dollars ($2,700,000.00) is for inflationary costs to fund the required
medical care of inmates housed in the department of corrections' facilities.
It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation be included in
the department of corrections' standard budget for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 085. WYOMING BUSINESS COUNCIL 1.
PROGRAM
Wyoming Business Council 1. 14,926,282 290,003 SR 15,216,285
Economic Divers. 2., 3., 4. 25,729,481 1,242,905 1,665,114 SR 28,637,500
Investment Ready Comm. 46,321,543 4,000,000 S4 50,321,543
31,946,543 35,946,543

TOTALS 86,977,306 1,242,905 5,955,117 94,175,328
72,602,306 79,800,328

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0

1. Of this general fund appropriation, twenty-three thousand one hundred
forty dollars ($23,140.00) is for information technology hardware. In
accordance with W.S. 9-2-1002(a)(ix), it is the intent of the legislature
that this appropriation not be included in the Wyoming business council's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

2. Of this general fund appropriation, three hundred fifty-five thousand
dollars ($355,000.00) is for contracting with the Wyoming women's business
center.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
3. Of this general fund appropriation, four hundred twenty-nine thousand
dollars ($429,000.00) is for continued funding for the Wyoming-Asia Pacific
trade office. It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation
not be included in the Wyoming business council's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

4. Of this federal funds appropriation, nine hundred thousand dollars
($900,000.00) is for administrative costs related to the state small business
credit initiative.

Section 096. STATE BUDGET DEPARTMENT
PROGRAM
Administration 1., 2. 3,388,759 3,388,759
TOTALS 3,388,759 0 0 3,388,759

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 8
Part Time 0
TOTAL 8

1. Of this general fund appropriation, five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000.00) may be expended for contract support or compensation of
temporary full-time and part-time employee positions within the state budget
department. This appropriation shall not be subject to Section 347 of this
act.
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $

2. Of this general fund appropriation, fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)
is for upgrades to the state's budget management system and may be matched
from funds from other state entities.

Section 101. SUPREME COURT 1.
PROGRAM
Administration 2. 12,113,527 778,930 4,134,508 SR 17,026,965
Judicial Nominating Comm. 34,942 34,942
Chancery Court 1,228,228 1,228,228
Law Library 1,328,227 1,328,227
Circuit Courts 3. 36,103,730 36,103,730
Court Automation 4,129,960 9,797,563 SR 13,927,523
Judicial Retirement 1,750,598 1,750,598
Treatment Court 3,129,667 1,400,000 SR
2,398,072 TT 6,927,739
Branchwide Resources 4., 5., 6.,
7., 8. 6,456,734 185,640 SR 6,642,374
6,637,442 6,823,082

TOTALS 66,275,613 778,930 17,915,783 84,970,326
66,456,321 85,151,034

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES 8.
Full Time 220 222
Part Time 21
TOTAL 241 243

1. (a) In accordance with W.S. 5-1-110(b) and subject to constitutional and
statutory provisions concerning when salaries can become effective, there is
appropriated one million four hundred sixty-one thousand dollars
($1,461,000.00) from the general fund for salary adjustments of supreme court
justices, district court judges and circuit court judges for the period
commencing July 1, 2024 and ending June 30, 2026 as specified in this
footnote. This appropriation shall be allocated as follows:

(i) Not more than one hundred sixty thousand dollars
($160,000.00) for distribution among five (5) supreme court justices to
effectuate a seven percent (7%) salary increase to one hundred eighty-seven
thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($187,250.00) annually;

(ii) Not more than seven hundred fifty-eight thousand dollars
($758,000.00) for distribution among district court judges to effectuate a
seven percent (7%) salary increase to one hundred seventy-one thousand two
hundred dollars ($171,200.00) annually;

(iii) Not more than five hundred forty-three thousand dollars
($543,000.00) for distribution among twenty-four (24) circuit court judges to
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
effectuate a six percent (6%) salary increase to one hundred fifty-three
thousand seven hundred dollars ($153,700.00) annually.

(b) It is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation be
specified separately and included in the judicial branch's standard budget
request for the immediately succeeding and all future fiscal biennia.

2. Of this general fund appropriation, five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000.00) is appropriated, and up to two (2) full-time employees are
authorized, within the administrative office of the courts as determined by
the judicial branch through the chief justice.

3. Of this general fund appropriation, seven hundred thousand dollars
($700,000.00) is appropriated and up to four (4) full-time employees are
authorized within the circuit courts division as determined by the judicial
branch.

4. Of this general fund appropriation, one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($125,000.00) is appropriated for the use of retired judges,
commissioners and magistrates for court coverage.

5. Of this general fund appropriation, eighty-seven thousand eight hundred
sixty dollars ($87,860.00) is for education, conferences and related travel
for judges, clerks and other judicial branch employees.
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $

6. Of this general fund appropriation, one hundred forty-six thousand two
hundred fourteen dollars ($146,214.00) is appropriated for inflationary
increases to branch wide utilities, supplies and travel.

7. Of this other funds appropriation, one hundred eighty-five thousand six
hundred forty dollars ($185,640.00)SR is appropriated for compensation
increases for positions whose compensation is paid from nongeneral fund
sources to provide payment of comparable salary increases and employer paid
benefits as that which is distributed to generally funded positions. For
positions whose compensation is partially funded by other funds, this
appropriation shall be expended for salary increases and employer paid
benefits in the same proportion as generally funded positions.

8. Of the authorized employees, one (1) full-time position is authorized
through June 30, 2025. No other authorized employee positions are time
limited.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Section 157. DISTRICT ATTORNEY/JUD DIST #7
PROGRAM
Administration 5,499,777 289,392 SR 5,789,169
5,952,077 6,241,469

TOTALS 5,499,777 0 289,392 5,789,169
5,952,077 6,241,469

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 21 24
Part Time 0
TOTAL 21 24

Section 205. EDUCATION-SCHOOL FINANCE
PROGRAM
School Foundation Program 1., 2. 1,857,545,635 S5 1,857,545,635
1,965,245,635 S5 1,965,245,635
Court Ordered Placements 17,183,639 S5 17,183,639
Foundation-Specials 5,765,000 S5 5,765,000

TOTALS 0 0 1,880,494,274 1,880,494,274
1,988,194,274 1,988,194,274

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0

1. (a) In accordance with W.S. 21-13-309(o), this other funds appropriation
includes funding for an external cost adjustment to the education resource
block grant model, effective beginning with school year 2024-2025, computed
as follows:

(i) Three and eight hundred seventy-one thousandths percent
(3.871%) for the "professional labor" category of model components inclusive
of those components defined by 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99, Section
3 [Attachment "A"(a)(vi)];

(ii) Four and one hundred six thousandths percent (4.106%) for
the "nonprofessional labor" category of model components inclusive of those
components defined by 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99, Section 3
[Attachment "A"(a)(v)];

(iii) Twenty-one and eight hundred fifty-two thousandths percent
(21.852%) for the "educational materials" category of model components
inclusive of those components defined by 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter
99, Section 3 [Attachment "A"(a)(iii)];

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
(iv) Fourteen and sixty-four hundredths percent (14.64%) for the
"energy" category of model components inclusive of those components defined
by 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99, Section 3 [Attachment "A"(a)(iv)].

2. (a) In accordance with W.S. 21-13-309(o), this other funds appropriation
includes funding for an external cost adjustment to the education resource
block grant model, effective beginning with school year 2025-2026, computed
as follows:

(i) Except as provided in paragraph (v) of this subsection, four
and seven hundred sixty-one thousandths percent (4.761%) for the
"professional labor" category of model components inclusive of those
components defined by 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99, Section 3
[Attachment "A"(a)(vi)];

(ii) Five and forty-one hundredths percent (5.41%) for the
"nonprofessional labor" category of model components inclusive of those
components defined by 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99, Section 3
[Attachment "A"(a)(v)];

(iii) One and sixty-seven thousandths percent (1.067%) for the
"educational materials" category of model components inclusive of those
components defined by 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99, Section 3
[Attachment "A"(a)(iii)];
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $

(iv) Negative six and two hundred eighty-five thousandths
percent (-6.285%) for the "energy" category of model components inclusive of
those components defined by 2012 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 99, Section 3
[Attachment "A"(a)(iv)];

(v) Six and seventy-eight hundredths percent (6.78%) to the
teacher salaries component as defined by 2011 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter
185, [Attachment "A"(b)(xxxvii)]. For purposes of this paragraph and in
accordance with 2011 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 185, [Attachment
"A"(b)(xxxvii)], "teachers" include core and specialist teachers,
instructional facilitators, tutors, ELL teachers, extended day teachers,
summer school teachers, pupil support staff, secondary school guidance
counselors and librarians.

Section 038. WYOMING GAMING COMMISSION 1.
PROGRAM
Administration 2., 3. 71,103,024 SR 71,103,024
TOTALS 0 0 71,103,024 71,103,024

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 2. 16
Part Time 2
TOTAL 18

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
1. Of this other funds appropriation, two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000.00)SR is appropriated for a statewide study of gaming in Wyoming
including the structure of the gaming commission as an entity within state
government, all pari-mutuel wagering activities, live horse racing, historic
horse race wagering, skill based amusement games and online sports
wagering. The review shall be conducted in consultation with the joint
appropriations committee and shall consider the number and growth of wagering
locations and activity, the commission's oversight capacity, the transparency
and efficiency of commission monitoring and reporting on licensees and horse
track safety. Based on industry standards, the study shall also identify
gaps in Wyoming law that affect or may affect the security, integrity or
fairness of gaming activities, such as statutes identifying key personnel who
should be required to obtain a gaming license or permit, grounds for denying
an application for a license or permit and processes and procedures to
address noncompliance with gaming laws and regulations, such as the issuance
of notice of violation and closure orders. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included in the Wyoming gaming
commission's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other
purpose.

2. Of this other funds appropriation, three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000.00)SR is appropriated, and of these authorized employees, one (1)
full-time position is authorized as a director and executive secretary. This
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
appropriation shall be for the purposes of identifying, recruiting and hiring
a director and executive secretary for the Wyoming gaming commission. The
Wyoming gaming commission shall hire a director who has executive experience
in the gaming industry, business, financial and personnel management skills,
experience with industry trends and developments, experience establishing
regulation and compliance and the ability to resolve disputes. Of these full-
time positions, one (1) full-time position authorized as a director and
executive secretary shall only be effective for the period beginning July 1,
2024 and ending July 1, 2025 to mitigate the loss of institutional knowledge
and disruption to the Wyoming gaming commission and ensure the director has
the opportunity to evaluate the Wyoming gaming commission and its operations.

3. Of this other funds appropriation, three hundred forty-three thousand two
hundred dollars ($343,200.00)SR is appropriated for up to five (5) at-will
employee contract positions within the personal services series (100 series)
or through the contractual services series (900 series) as necessary for the
purposes of race day staffing and operations at pari-mutuel events to include
veterinarians, racing stewards, license clerks and drug testing staff to
enhance the ability of the Wyoming gaming commission to respond to additional
and overlapping race days. This appropriation shall not be subject to Section
347 of this act. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose. This appropriation is effective immediately.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
Section 3. 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 300 by
creating a new subsection (p), 301(b), 303(a), (g) and (h)(intro), 311,
318(a)(intro) and (a) amending 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 51, as
amended by 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 94, Section 321(e) and (f) and
325(d), 323(f) and by creating a new subsection (g), 332, 342, by creating
new sections 345 through 350 and 399 by creating a new subsection (d) are
amended to read:

[BUDGET BALANCERS - TRANSFERS]

Section 300.

(p) The state auditor shall transfer seventy million dollars
($70,000,000.00) from the legislative stabilization reserve account to the
general fund.

[BORROWING AUTHORITY - CASH FLOW AND EXECUTIVE PROGRAMS]

Section 301.

(b) The governor is authorized to borrow from the legislative
stabilization reserve account up to twenty million dollars ($20,000,000.00)
thirty million dollars ($30,000,000.00) as necessary to meet funding
requirements to fight wildland fires in the event reserves in the office of
state lands and investments' forestry division, homeland security disaster
contingency budget and the governor's office special contingency budget have
been exhausted. The governor shall report to the joint appropriations
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
committee, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of
representatives immediately upon exercise of this authority.

[CARRYOVER APPROPRIATIONS]

Section 303.

[INFRASTRUCTURE GRANTS ADMINISTRATION]

(a) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, of
unexpended, unobligated monies appropriated from the general fund to the
governor's office under 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 51, Section 2,
Section 001, subject to footnote 1 of that section, one million two hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($1,250,000.00), or as much thereof as is available,
shall not revert on June 30, 2024 and are hereby reappropriated to the
governor's office for one (1) or more at-will employee contract positions
within the personal services series (100 series) or through the contractual
services series (900 series) as necessary to enhance the state's
opportunities to secure infrastructure grants. The governor's office shall
regularly inform the legislature through the joint appropriations committee
on the results of expenditures and grants secured. This reappropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose. This
reappropriation shall not be subject to Section 347 of this act.

[CHANCERY COURT]

(g) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, of
unexpended, unobligated monies appropriated from the general fund to the
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
supreme court under 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 51, Section 2, Section
101, as amended by 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 94, Section 2, Section
101, for the chancery court, up to nine hundred forty-seven thousand forty-
eight dollars ($947,048.00) or as much thereof as is available, shall not
revert on June 30, 2024 and are hereby reappropriated to the supreme court
for the chancery court.

[UNIVERSITY OF WYOMING MATCHING FUNDS FOR RESEARCH]

(h) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, of
unexpended, unobligated monies appropriated from the general fund to the
University of Wyoming under 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 51, Section 2,
Section 067 as amended by 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 94, Section 2,
Section 067 for matching funds subject to footnote 8 for research grants and
contracts related to flow through porous media, up to twenty-five million
dollars ($25,000,000.00) or as much thereof as is available, shall not revert
on June 30, 2024 and are hereby reappropriated to the University of Wyoming
to match research grants and contracts related to flow through porous media.
This reappropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other
purpose and any unexpended, unobligated monies shall revert as provided by
law on June 30, 2025. Expenditure of this reappropriation is conditioned
upon:

[CONCURRENCE WITH GOVERNOR'S BIENNIAL BUDGET DEVELOPMENT RECOMMENDATIONS]

Section 311. Unless otherwise provided in this act, it is the intent
of the legislature to concur with the recommendations contained in the
governor's 2025-2026 biennial budget and 2025-2026 supplemental budget for
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
one-time funding, funding intended to be sustained and funding or budget
reductions intended to be doubled and be included in the standard budget for
the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium. Furthermore, it is the intent of
the legislature that continuation of at-will employee contract positions not
explicitly denied by this act shall continue as requested throughout the
period of July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2026 and be included in the standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

[REVISIONS TO PRIOR APPROPRIATIONS]

Section 318.

(a) 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 51, as amended by 2023 Wyoming
Session Laws, Chapter 94, Section 321(a), (d), (e) and by creating a new
subsection (f), Section 325(a), (b), (d) and by creating new subsections (e)
and (f), Section 333(b) and by creating a new subsection (d) and Section 334
are amended to read:

[ENERGY MATCHING FUNDS]

Section 321.

(e) All proposed expenditures from this the appropriation
in subsection (a) of this section and the purposes and goals of
each expenditure shall be reported to the management council of
the legislature and the joint appropriations committee prior to
the expenditure being made. The management council shall review
and make a recommendation on all proposed expenditures prior to
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
expenditure by the governor.

(f) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and
9-4-207:,

(i) Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000.00), or as
much thereof as is available, shall revert to the budget
reserve account on or before March 15, 2025; and

(ii) Any unexpended, unobligated funds from the
appropriation in subsection (a) of this section remaining
after the reversion of funds in paragraph (i) of this
subsection shall not revert until June 30, 2027.

[APPROPRIATION TO MATCH FEDERAL INFRASTRUCTURE GRANTS]

Section 325.

(d) As a condition of expending this appropriation, All
proposed expenditures from this appropriation and the purposes
and goals of each expenditure shall be reported to the management
council of the legislature and the joint appropriations committee
prior to the expenditure being made. The management council
shall review and make a recommendation on all proposed
expenditures prior to expenditure by the governor.

[LARGE PROJECT ENERGY MATCHING FUNDS]

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
Section 323.

(f) All proposed expenditures from this appropriation and the purposes
and goals of each expenditure shall be reported to the management council of
the legislature and the joint appropriations committee prior to the
expenditure being made. The management council shall review and make a
recommendation on all proposed expenditures prior to expenditure by the
governor.

(g) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008 and 9-4-207, an amount such that the
sum of the reverted funds under this section combined with any reversion
under 2022 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 51, Section 321, as amended by 2023
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 94, and further amended in this act, equals one
hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00), or as much thereof as is
available, shall revert to the budget reserve account on or before March 15,
2025.

[CHARTER SCHOOL IN WESTERN WYOMING]

Section 332. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, on or after
the effective date of this act, one (1) charter school may be authorized in
the western half of Wyoming by the Wyoming charter school authorizing board.
This charter school shall be in addition to the four (4) charter schools
authorized pursuant to 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 179, Section 4.

[WYOMING SPANISH-AMERICAN WAR MONUMENT]

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
Section 342. There is appropriated seventy-five thousand dollars
($75,000.00) from the general fund to the department of state parks and
cultural resources for repair and installation of the Wyoming Spanish-
American War monument. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose. It is the intent of the legislature that
this appropriation not be included in the department of state parks and
cultural resources' standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium. Of this appropriation, thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars
($37,500.00) is effective immediately.

[NATURAL RESOURCE LITIGATION ACCOUNT]

Section 345.

(a) The account created by 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 112,
Section 2 and continued in 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 6, Section 1
shall be continued and renamed as the natural resource litigation account.
Any funds in the account on the effective date of this act shall remain in
the account until reverted as provided in this section. Funds shall not be
transferred or expended for any purpose other than administering and
enforcing the provisions of this section. Funds in the account are
continuously appropriated to the office of the governor for the purposes of
funding any litigation expenses incurred in accordance with this section.

(b) There is appropriated three million six hundred thousand dollars
($3,600,000.00) from the general fund to the natural resource litigation
account. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207, any
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining in the account shall revert as
provided by law on June 30, 2027.

(c) The governor may expend funds from the natural resource litigation
account for the purposes of defending, commencing, intervening in or
prosecuting lawsuits against the United States and its agencies, other states
and their agencies and local governments that enact and enforce laws or
regulations, or other actions by the United States and its agencies, other
states and their agencies, local governments and third parties, that
impermissibly impede Wyoming's ability to manage or develop its natural
resources. For purposes of this subsection, laws, regulations and actions may
include, but are not limited to, restrictions on the leasing, use or export
of coal and any measures that cause or result in the retirement of coal-fired
electric generation facilities located in Wyoming, a decreased use of Wyoming
coal or the closure of coal-fired electric generation facilities that use
Wyoming coal.

(d) On or before October 1, 2025 and each October 1 thereafter through
October 1, 2027, the governor and the attorney general shall report to the
joint appropriations committee and the joint minerals, business and economic
development interim committee on:

(i) The expenditure of any funds in the natural resource
litigation account incurred in defending, commencing, intervening in or
prosecuting lawsuits authorized in accordance with this section;

(ii) The status of any litigation initiated, intervened in,
defended, prosecuted or concluded using the funds in the natural resource
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
litigation account. The governor and attorney general may present the
information required by this paragraph in executive session.

[NATURAL DISASTER MITIGATION LOANS]

Section 346.

(a) The state loan and investment board is authorized to make loans
under this section from the legislative stabilization reserve account for the
purpose of mitigation and restoration projects needed as a result of wildfire
and specified disasters that occur within the state of Wyoming. The
aggregate sum of all loans made under this section shall not exceed one
hundred million dollars ($100,000,000.00). No new loans under this section
shall be made after June 30, 2027.

(b) The office of state lands and investments, under the direction of
the state loan and investment board, shall establish and administer loans
under this section to qualified persons, including political subdivisions,
for any of the following purposes:

(i) Restoring grass, hay and vegetation destroyed by wildfire or
other natural disasters on state and private lands;

(ii) Preventing the establishment of non-native invasive
terrestrial vegetation on private or state lands affected by wildfire or
other natural disasters;

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
(iii) Replacing private fences destroyed or partially destroyed
by wildfire or other natural disasters;

(iv) Replacing and restoring the habitat and the resources
provided by that habitat destroyed by wildfire or other natural disasters on
state and private land;

(v) Repairing or replacing irrigation facilities destroyed by
wildfire or other natural disasters on state and private land;

(vi) Repairing or replacing private structures destroyed by
wildfire or other natural disasters;

(vii) Providing funding for any private cost share required of
federal or state funding that would otherwise qualify under this section;

(viii) Providing monetary assistance to farmers and ranchers
whose real property or assets are damaged by catastrophic events. As used in
this paragraph, "catastrophic event" means a fire, earthquake, breached dam
or other natural or man-made event to a farming or ranching operation or to
state land that causes monetary damage of at least one hundred thousand
dollars ($100,000.00).

(c) All loan applications under this section shall be provided to the
Wyoming wildlife and natural resource trust fund board for a recommendation
to the state loan and investment board. All loans shall be subject to final
approval by the state loan and investment board.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
(d) The loan program established and administered by the office of
state lands and investments under this section shall be subject to all of the
following:

(i) All applicants for loans shall reasonably demonstrate that
they have applied for insurance payments for which they are eligible and all
reasonably identifiable and applicable federal and state funding or were not
eligible for other reasonably identifiable and applicable federal or state
funding;

(ii) Loans shall be secured by collateral from each applicant,
which may include land, structures, equipment and livestock. Collateral
required under this paragraph may be accepted in a subordinate lien position;

(iii) The office shall develop the application forms,
requirements and conditions needed to ensure timely repayment of loans;

(iv) The office shall impose any other necessary loan terms;

(v) The maximum term of loans shall not exceed twenty (20)
years;

(vi) The interest rate on all loans shall be two percent (2%).

(e) Interest payments received from loans under this section shall be
deposited to the general fund, except that up to one-half (1/2) of all
interest payments may be retained by the office of state lands and
investments and are continuously appropriated for administration of the loan
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
program. All principal payments shall be deposited to the legislative
stabilization reserve account.

(f) The office of state lands and investments shall maintain any
records and accounts of revenues and expenditures in relation to loans under
this section as required by the director of the state department of audit.
Not later than October 15 of each year in which the loan program is
operational, the office shall report to the joint appropriations committee
and the joint agriculture, state and public lands and water resources interim
committee on the purposes and amount of loans approved under this section.

[PERSONAL SERVICES TRANSFERS]

Section 347.

(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided, nonfederal fund
appropriations for personal services (100 series) contained in this act shall
not be transferred to any other series or expended for any purpose other than
personal services. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1005(b)(ii) or any other
provision of this act, nonfederal fund appropriations for contractual
services (900 series) contained in this act shall not be transferred to the
personal services (100 series).

(b) The following appropriations and agencies are exempt from this
section:

(i) Section 2, Section 020 of this act, to the department of
environmental quality;
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782

(ii) Section 2, Section 048 of this act, to the department of
health;

(iii) Section 2, Section 080 of this act, to the department of
corrections;

(iv) Any other appropriation in this act that specifies that the
appropriation shall not be subject to this section.

(c) The judicial branch is exempt from this section for transfers in a
total amount not to exceed four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000.00).

[WYOMING STATE SHOOTING COMPLEX – APPROPRIATIONS]

Section 348.

(a) As used in this section, "Wyoming state shooting complex" means a
facility located in Park county, near Cody, Wyoming described in the state
shooting complex development and oversight task force final recommendation as
submitted to the governor, the joint appropriations committee and the joint
travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee dated
August 8, 2024.

(b) Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008 and 9-4-207, of unexpended,
unobligated monies in the state shooting complex account created by 2023
Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 146, Section 3, up to ten million dollars
($10,000,000.00) or as much thereof as is available, and three million
SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
dollars ($3,000,000.00) from the Wyoming tourism reserve and projects account
are appropriated to the department of state parks and cultural resources for
the development, siting and construction of the Wyoming state shooting
complex. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008 and 9-4-207, any unexpended,
unobligated funds from these appropriations shall not revert and are
authorized to be expended for the operation and maintenance of the Wyoming
state shooting complex, subject to the conditions prescribed in subsection
(d) of this section. These appropriations shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose.

(c) Notwithstanding W.S. 23-1-501(b) and subject to approval by the
Wyoming game and fish commission, there is appropriated five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000.00) from the game and fish fund to the department of state
parks and cultural resources for infrastructure to support hunter safety and
other wildlife conservation education programs conducted at the Wyoming state
shooting complex. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008 and 9-4-207, any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from this appropriations shall not revert. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose.
The appropriation in this subsection shall only be effective if 2025 Senate
File 0099 is enacted into law.

(d) The department of state parks and cultural resources, in
consultation with the governor, is authorized to enter into a memorandum of
understanding, memorandum of agreement or contract for the development,
siting, construction, operation and maintenance of the Wyoming state shooting
complex. An agreement or contract entered into under this subsection shall be
subject to the following:

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
(i) Funds shall only be expended by the department for the
operation and maintenance of the Wyoming state shooting complex if matching
funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of appropriated funds to not less
than four dollars ($4.00) of matching funds from any nonstate source are
expended;

(ii) After the fourth year of operation, any revenue from
operation of the Wyoming state shooting complex in excess of one million
dollars ($1,000,000.00) more than the annual operating cost shall be used to
reduce the state share of expenditures for operation and maintenance in a
ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of appropriated funds to not less than one dollar
($1.00) of revenue, but not to exceed two hundred and fifty thousand dollars
($250,000.00) in a fiscal year;

(iii) State appropriated funds, including any amounts authorized
for expenditure for the operation and maintenance under subsections (b) and
(c) of this section, shall not exceed two hundred and fifty thousand dollars
($250,000.00) for the operation and maintenance of the Wyoming state shooting
complex in any one (1) fiscal year.

(e) It is the intent of the legislature that the department of state
parks and cultural resources submit an exception request not to exceed five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) for matching funds for the operation
and maintenance of the Wyoming state shooting complex for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium from the Wyoming tourism reserve and projects
account or from the general fund if funds are insufficient in the Wyoming
tourism reserve and projects account.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
(f) The department of state parks and cultural resources shall report
to the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim
committee and the joint appropriations committee not later than October 1,
2025 to provide an update on the Wyoming state shooting complex and shall
report again on October 1, 2026 and October 1, 2027 on the operation of the
Wyoming state shooting complex.

[LOAN REPAYMENT – UNIVERSITY OF WYOMING]

Section 349. Pursuant to 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 187,
Section 11(b), the state auditor shall transfer forty million dollars
($40,000,000.00) from the general fund to the legislative stabilization
reserve account for loan repayment on behalf of the University of Wyoming for
funds loaned to the University of Wyoming 2023 capital projects account.

[LIMITATION ON SALARY INCREASE]

Section 350.

(a) The 2027-2028 biennial general fund standard budget for personal
services (100 series) for each agency shall be less than or equal to the
2025-2026 biennial appropriations for personal services (100 series) for each
agency in all enacted laws including any calculated amount to continue
legislatively approved compensation increases throughout the 2025-2026
biennium and excluding benefit adjustments and allowable personal services
transfers executed pursuant to Section 347 of this act and documented through
the report required by W.S. 9-2-1011(c).

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
(b) Any salary increase for an executive branch state position
including those of the game and fish department, department of transportation
and boards and commissions and excluding positions of the University of
Wyoming or community colleges during the 2025-2026 biennium for which the
compensation increase has not been approved by the legislature shall be
reviewed and approved by the governor or his designee.

(c) Any salary increase for a judicial branch position during the
2025-2026 biennium for which the compensation increase has not been approved
by the legislature shall be reviewed and approved by either the district
court judge, chief justice of the supreme court or the board of judicial
policy and administration.

(d) Any salary increase approved under subsections (b) and (c) of this
section shall be reported quarterly to the joint appropriations committee.

[REPEALED SECTIONS]

Section 399.

(d) 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 6, Section 1 is repealed.

SF0001

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0782
[EFFECTIVE DATE]

Section 400. This act is effective immediately upon completion of all
acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8
of the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0001